Wyoming, session 2025, HB0272.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-7-126 is created to read:

9-7-126. Wyoming housing investment program; account;
requirements.
HB0272

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0632

(a) The legislature finds and declares that:

(i) There is in this state a critical shortage
of adequate, affordable housing;

(ii) It is in the public interest of the
citizens of this state to facilitate the provision of
adequate, affordable housing in order to promote the
economic welfare of the state and its residents by
increasing employment opportunities, stimulating economic
activity, augmenting sources of tax revenue and fostering
economic stability, thus improving the state's economy;

(iii) It is the purpose of this section to
promote and continue economic development by providing
grants and loans for adequate housing necessary to create
additional economic benefit to the state;

(iv) This section constitutes a valid public
purpose of primary benefit to the state of Wyoming.

HB0272

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0632
(b) There is created the Wyoming housing investment
program. The authority shall administer the program under
this section. The authority shall promulgate all rules
necessary to administer and implement the program.

(c) There is created the Wyoming housing investment
account. The authority shall manage and administer the
account. All funds within the account are continuously
appropriated to the authority for purposes of this section.
The account shall consist of all funds transferred or
deposited to the account from any source and all monies
collected from federal grants and other contributions,
grants, gifts, bequests and donations to the account.

(d) The Wyoming housing investment account shall be
available for the following projects in the following
annual amounts:

(i) Not more than fifty percent (50%) of the
account balance in any fiscal year shall be expended for
grants and loans to nonprofit entities for the following
purposes and subject to the following conditions:

HB0272

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0632
(A) Grants and loans under this paragraph
shall be made only for:

(I) New construction of adequate,
affordable housing, including land acquisition,
infrastructure and building materials and labor costs;

(II) Rehabilitation of existing
housing in order to provide adequate and affordable
housing, including housing that is or was eligible for the
federal low-income housing tax credit but for which
eligibility for the credit has been exhausted or has
expired due to the housing no longer complying with the
requirements for the credit or to provide housing that
qualifies for any other low-income housing tax credit that
may be available under federal law;

(III) Transitional housing projects
for unhoused persons;

(IV) First-time homebuyer assistance;

(V) A program for rental vouchers.
HB0272

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0632

(B) Grants and loans made under this
paragraph shall be disbursed only to nonprofit entities
located in Wyoming;

(C) Loans issued under this paragraph shall
have an interest rate of zero percent (0%) and any other
terms and conditions required by the authority;

(D) Funds repaid from any loan issued under
this paragraph shall be deposited in the Wyoming housing
investment account.

(ii) Not more than forty-five percent (45%) of
the account balance in any fiscal year shall be expended
for loans for business entities for the following purposes
and subject to the following conditions:

(A) Loans under this paragraph shall be
made only for:

HB0272

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0632
(I) New construction of adequate,
affordable housing, including land acquisition,
infrastructure and building material and labor costs;

(II) Rehabilitation of existing
housing in order to provide adequate and affordable
housing, including housing that is or was eligible for the
federal low-income housing tax credit but for which
eligibility for the credit has been exhausted or has
expired due to the housing no longer complying with the
requirements for the credit or to provide housing that
qualifies for any other low-income housing tax credit that
may be available under federal law.

(B) Loans shall be made only to persons who
are residents of Wyoming or whose principal place of
business is located in Wyoming;

(C) Loans issued under this paragraph shall
require interest to be charged at a rate set by rule of the
authority, provided that the interest rate shall not exceed
the benchmark United States effective federal funds
interest rate;
HB0272

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0632

(D) The authority may impose other terms
and conditions on loans issued under this paragraph;

(E) Funds repaid from any loan issued under
this paragraph shall be deposited in the Wyoming housing
investment account.

(iii) Not more than four percent (4%) of the
account balance in any fiscal year shall be expended for
capacity building grants for cities, towns, counties and
nonprofit entities to conduct or have conducted studies,
analysis and research for housing and for grant
administration and planning staff for projects authorized
in this section;

(iv) Not more than one percent (1%) of the
account balance in any fiscal year shall be expended by the
authority on administrative expenses, including at-will
employment contract positions for the fiscal year.

(e) For purposes of the account balances specified in
subsection (d) of this section, balances shall be
HB0272

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0632
calculated after the transfer required under W.S.
9-4-220(c).

(f) The authority shall establish an application
process for the grants and loans that are available under
this section. The authority may establish a fee for the
ongoing monitoring of projects receiving grants and loans
under this section to ensure that the projects remain in
compliance with this section and any associated rules.

(g) No grant or loan shall be made under this section
without the written opinion of the attorney general
certifying the legality of the transaction and all
documents connected therewith.

(h) Not later than November 1 of each year, the
authority shall report to the joint appropriations
committee on:

(i) The balance of the Wyoming housing
investment account;

HB0272

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0632
(ii) All grants and loans made in the
immediately preceding fiscal year under this section,
including the recipients of each grant and loan and the
purpose for which the grant or loan was made;

(iii) All outstanding loans made under this
section, and the balance of each loan;

(iv) Any recommendations for legislation for the
Wyoming housing investment program.

(j) No new grant or loan shall be issued under the
Wyoming housing investment program on and after July 1,
2031. All grants and loans for projects under this section
issued before July 1, 2031 shall be completed in accordance
with this section and the terms and conditions of each
grant or loan. The authority shall remit all unexpended,
unobligated funds in the Wyoming housing investment account
on July 1, 2031, and on each July 1 thereafter until no
funds remain outstanding for the account, to the state
treasurer to be deposited into the strategic investments
and projects account.

HB0272

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0632
Section 2. W.S. 9-4-219 by creating a new subsection
(c), 9-4-220(b)(intro) and by creating a new subsection (c)
and 9-7-103(a)(xvi) are amended to read:

9-4-219. Legislative stabilization reserve account
created; purposes; legislative deficit control account.

(c) On July 1, 2025 and again on July 1, 2026, the
state treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars
($10,000,000.00), or as much thereof as is available, from
any unobligated funds within the legislative stabilization
reserve account to the Wyoming housing investment account
created by W.S. 9-7-126(c).

9-4-220. Strategic investments and projects account
created; purposes; fund transfers.

(b) For fiscal year 2021 and in each fiscal year
thereafter and subject to subsections (c) and (d) of this
section, unencumbered and unobligated funds available for
expenditure in the strategic investments and projects
account shall be expended for the following purposes and
subject to the following:
HB0272

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0632

(c) On July 1, 2025 and again on July 1, 2026, the
state treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars
($10,000,000.00), or as much thereof as is available, from
any unobligated funds within the strategic investments and
projects account to the Wyoming housing investment account
created by W.S. 9-7-126(c). Beginning on July 1, 2027 and
on July 1 of each fiscal year thereafter through July 1,
2030, the state treasurer shall transfer twenty million
dollars ($20,000,000.00), or as much thereof as is
available, from any unobligated funds within the strategic
investments and projects account to the Wyoming housing
investment account created by W.S. 9-7-126(c).

9-7-103. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(xvi) "This act" means W.S. 9-7-101 through
9-7-125 9-7-126.

HB0272

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0632
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0272